Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-113
Advisory committee; membership.

(1) The board shall appoint an advisory committee consisting of at least seven members. A majority of the members shall be appointed as representatives of the postsecondary educational institutions of Nebraska engaged in the instruction of accounting and auditing, including the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges, and private universities and colleges. One member of the advisory committee shall be a certified public accountant who is a member of the board.

(2) The advisory committee shall meet at least annually and shall advise the board upon the rules and regulations for section 1-116 relating to educational requirements. The board may also consult the advisory committee on any other issues which it deems appropriate.

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 11.